Massachusetts, session 194th, H705.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 37H3/4 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
"(b) Any principal, headmaster, superintendent or person acting as a decision-maker at a
student meeting or hearing, when deciding the consequences for the student, shall consider ways
to re-engage the student in the learning process; and shall not suspend or expel a student until
alternative remedies have been employed and their use and results documented, following and in
direct response to a specific incident or incidents, unless specific reasons are documented as to
why such alternative remedies are unsuitable or counter-productive, except, however, in cases
where the student’s continued presence in school would pose a specific, documentable concern
of 2

about the infliction of serious bodily injury or other serious harm upon another person while in
school or has caused a significant disruption to the learning environment for other students.
Alternative remedies may include, but shall not be limited to: (i) mediation; (ii) conflict
resolution; (iii) restorative justice; and (iv) collaborative problem solving. The principal,
headmaster, superintendent or person acting as a decision-maker shall also implement school- or
district-wide models to re-engage students in the learning process which shall include but not be
limited to: (i) positive behavioral interventions and supports models and (ii) trauma sensitive
learning models; provided, however, that school- or district-wide models shall not be considered
a direct response to a specific incident."
of 2